Utah statutes.
76-6-523.   Obstruction of the leasing of real property for natural resource or agricultural production -- Criminal penalties.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Competitive process" includes public auction or other public competitive bidding process.

(b)  "Natural resource or agricultural production" means:

(i)  the extraction or production of oil, gas, hydrocarbons, or other minerals;

(ii)  production for commercial purposes of crops, livestock, and livestock products, including grazing; or

(iii)  activities similar in purpose to those listed in Subsections (1)(b)(i) and (ii).

(2)  A person is guilty of obstruction of the leasing of real property for natural resource or agricultural production if the person:

(a)  bids for a lease as part of a competitive process for the lease;

(b)  does not intend to pay for the lease at the time the person makes the bid described in Subsection (2)(a); and

(c)  does not pay the lessor in full for the lease as required by the lease agreement.

(3)  The offense of obstruction of the leasing of real property for natural resource or agricultural production is:

(a)  a third degree felony; and

(b)  subject to a minimum fine of not less than $7,500.



Enacted by Chapter 306, 2009 General Session

